apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  
	<!-- symbols -->
	<sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="email"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="url"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="sym"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
    <sdef n="mon"/>
  </sdefs>
	
	<!-- paradigms -->
	<pardefs>

   

	<pardef n="guionet">
		<e>
			<p>
				<l>-</l> 
				<r>-<s n="guio"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="coma">
		<e>
			<p>
				<l>,</l> 
				<r>,<s n="cm"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
    <pardef n="aposchar">
      <e>
        <i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’</l>
          <r>'</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="numeros">
		<e>
			<re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
			<p>
				<l/> 
				<r><s n="num"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
		<e>
			<re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
			<p>
				<l/> 
				<r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="separa">
		<e>
			<re>[.\?;:!]</re>
			<p>
				<l/> 
				<r><s n="sent"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="separ">
		<e>
			<re>[¿¡]</re>
			<p>
				<l/> 
				<r><s n="lquest"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="paresq">
		<e>
			<re>[\(\[]</re>
			<p>
				<l/> 
				<r><s n="lpar"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pardret">
		<e>
			<re>[\)\]]</re>
			<p>
				<l/> 
				<r><s n="rpar"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="emails">
		<e>
			<re>[a-z.ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+@[a-z\-.ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+[a-z\-ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+</re>
			<p>
				<l/> 
				<r><s n="num"/></r> 
			</p>
		</e>
		
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="urls">
		<e>
			<re>((http://)([a-z\-ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+[.])+[a-zÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+)</re>
			<p>
				<l/>
				<r><s n="num"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="urls2">
		<e>
			<re>((www.)([a-z\-ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+[.])+[a-zÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûü]+)</re>
			<p>
				<l/>
				<r><s n="num"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>
	</pardef>
    
   <pardef n="ordinals">
    
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]1|1)</re>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]2|2)</re>
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]3|3)</re>
        <p>
          <l>rd</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>1[0-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]*([4-90]|1[0-9])</re>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="acronimos">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>     
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>    
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>    
    </pardef> 

 <pardef n="time">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+[.:][0-5][0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 
 <pardef n="proper_names">
      <e>
        <re>(Mr|Miss|Ms|Mrs|Dr).?</re>
        <i><b/></i>
        <re>[ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ][ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz]*</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>(Mr|Miss|Ms|Mrs|Dr).?</re>
        <i><b/></i>
        <re>[ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ][ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz]*</re>
        <i><b/></i>
        <re>[ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ][ÀÃÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòõóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz]*</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="currency">
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([. ,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([. ,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?m</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="expensive__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that form the comparative and superlative forms with more and the most respectively">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="long/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that add -er and -est to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>est</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="Icelandic">
        <i>Icelandic</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="abnormal">
        <i>abnormal</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="annual">
        <i>annual</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="blind">
        <i>blind</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="bottom">
        <i>bottom</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="bright">
        <i>bright</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="clear">
        <i>clear</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="colonial">
        <i>colonial</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="corresponding">
        <i>corresponding</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="dark">
        <i>dark</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="diligent">
	    <i>diligent</i> 
	    <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="dumb">
        <i>dumb</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="electromagnetic">
        <i>electromagnetic</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="faecal">
        <i>faecal</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fast">
        <i>fast</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fraudulent">
        <i>fraudulent</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fresh">
        <i>fresh</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="green">
        <i>green</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="high">
        <i>high</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="homologous">
        <i>homologous</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="incompetent">
        <i>incompetent</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="intermittent">
        <i>intermittent</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="light">
        <i>light</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="liturgical">
        <i>liturgical</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="mild">
        <i>mild</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="military">
        <i>military</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="brand-new">
	<i>brand-new</i> 
	<par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="northern">
        <i>northern</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="palatine">
        <i>palatine</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="pink">
        <i>pink</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="postal">
        <i>postal</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="proud">
        <i>proud</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="raw">
        <i>raw</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="rotary">
        <i>rotary</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="shallow">
        <i>shallow</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="slow">
        <i>slow</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sober">
        <i>sober</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="south">
        <i>south</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sympathetic">
        <i>sympathetic</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="tall">
        <i>tall</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="useful">
        <i>useful</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="warm">
        <i>warm</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="yellow">
        <i>yellow</i> 
        <par n="long/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="semifinalist">
        <i>semifinalist</i> 
        <par n="expensive__adj"/> 
    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="pardret"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="guionet"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="separ"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="numeros"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="urls"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="urls2"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="emails"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="paresq"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="coma"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="cometa"/> 
	    </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="separa"/> 
	  </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="ordinals"/> 
	  </e>
    <e>
		    <par n="acronimos" /> 
	  </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="time"/> 
	  </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="currency"/> 
	  </e>
	    <e>
		    <par n="proper_names"/> 
	  </e>
